District of Columbia statutes.
5-419

Cadet program — Rules.

The Mayor or the Mayor’s designated agent may issue rules necessary for the implementation and operation of the cadet programs established pursuant to §§ 5-109.01 and 5-418.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 6, 29 DCR 5745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-319.